bg-BG: Контрол на заглушаването на мембраната за барабан: Централна точка; Контролен пръстен (външен); Контролен пръстен (вътрешен); Няма; Пълно с масло; Предварително заглушаване / заглушаващ пръстен; С вентилационни / резонаторни отвори; Друго
sl-SI: Nadzor dušenja glave bobna: Sredinska pika; Dušilni obroč (zunanji); Dušilni obroč (notranji); Brez; Polnjeno z oljem; Predhodno zadušeno/dušilni obroč; Zračno/z odprtino; Drugo
da: Dæmpningskontrol til trommeskind: Centrumpunkt; Kontrolring (udvendig); Kontrolring (indvendig); Ingen; Olieholdig; Fordæmpet / dæmpering; Ventileret / med lydhul; Andet
ro-RO: Controlul amortizării membranei de tobă: Punct central; Inel de control (extern); Inel de control (intern); Fără; Umplut cu ulei; Pre-atenuat / inel de amortizare; Ventilat / cu orificiu; Altele
fr: Contrôle d’amortissement de peau de batterie: Point central; Anneau de contrôle (externe); Anneau de contrôle (interne); Aucun; Rempli d’huile; Pré-atténuée / anneau d’atténuation; Ventilé / troué; Autre
es: Control de amortiguación del parche del tambor: Punto central; Anillo de control (externo); Anillo de control (interno); Ninguno; Relleno de aceite; Preamortiguado/anillo de amortiguación; Ventilado/con puerto; Otro
hr-HR: Kontrola prigušenja membrane bubnja: Središnja točka; Kontrolni prsten (vanjski); Kontrolni prsten (unutarnji); Nema; Punjeno uljem; Pred-prigušeno / prsten za prigušivanje; S otvorima; Ostalo
vi: Kiểm soát giảm chấn mặt trống: Chấm giữa; Vòng kiểm soát (gắn ngoài); Vòng kiểm soát (gắn trong); Không có; Chứa dầu; Giảm chấn trước / vòng giảm chấn; Có lỗ thông hơi / lỗ khoét; Khác
hu: A dobfej csillapításának szabályozása: Középső pont; Szabályozógyűrű (külső); Szabályozógyűrű (belső); Nincs; Olajjal töltött; Előre tompított / tompítógyűrű; Szellőző / portolt; Egyéb
nl: Drumvel dempingsregeling: Middenstip; Dempring (extern); Dempring (intern); Geen; Oliegevuld; Voorgedempt / dempring; Met gat (gepoort); Overige
fi: Rumpukalvon vaimennuksen säätö: Keskivahvike; Vaimennusrengas (ulkoinen); Vaimennusrengas (sisäinen); Ei mitään; Öljytäytteinen; Esimaimennettu / vaimennusrengas; Tuuletettu / aukollinen; Muu
el: Έλεγχος απόσβεσης κεφαλής τυμπάνου: Κεντρική κουκκίδα; Δακτύλιος ελέγχου (εξωτερικός); Δακτύλιος ελέγχου (εσωτερικός); Κανένα; Με πλήρωση λαδιού; Προ-φιμωμένο / δακτύλιος απόσβεσης; Με εξαερισμό / οπές; Άλλο
ru: Контроль демпфирования барабанной кожи: Центральная точка; Демпферное кольцо (внешнее); Демпферное кольцо (внутреннее); Нет; Маслонаполненная; С предглушителем / демпферным кольцом; С вентиляционным / фазоинверторным отверстием; Другое
tr: Davul derisi sönümleme kontrolü: Orta nokta; Kontrol halkası (dış); Kontrol halkası (iç); Yok; Yağ dolgulu; Önceden boğuklaştırılmış / susturucu halka; Delikli / havalandırmalı; Diğer
cs: Ovládání tlumení blány bubnu: Středová tečka; Tlumicí kroužek (vnější); Tlumicí kroužek (vnitřní); Žádné; Plněné olejem; Předtlumené / tlumicí kroužek; S otvory / portované; Jiné
zh-CN: 鼓皮阻尼控制: 中心点; 控制圈（外置）; 控制圈（内置）; 无; 充油; 预弱音/弱音圈; 气孔/开孔; 其他
ja: ドラムヘッドの減衰制御: センタードット; コントロールリング (外部); コントロールリング (内部); なし; オイル入り; プレマッフル/ダンピングリング; ベント/ポート付き; その他
pt-PT: Controlo de amortecimento da pele do tambor: Ponto central; Anel de controlo (externo); Anel de controlo (interno); Nenhum; Com óleo; Pré-abafado/anel de abafamento; Ventilado/com orifício; Outro
sv: Dämpningskontroll för trumskinn: Mittpunkt; Dämpring (extern); Dämpring (intern); Ingen; Oljefylld; Fördämpad/dämpring; Ventilerad/portad; Övrigt
pl: Kontrola tłumienia naciągu perkusyjnego: Centralna łatka; Pierścień tłumiący (zewnętrzny); Pierścień tłumiący (wewnętrzny); Brak; Wypełniony olejem; Fabrycznie tłumiony / pierścień tłumiący; Wentylowany / z otworem; Inne
nb: Dempingskontroll for trommeskinn: Senterprikk; Kontrollring (utvendig); Kontrollring (innvendig); Ingen; Oljefylt; Forhåndsdemping / dempering; Ventilert / portet; Annet
en: Drum head damping control: Center dot; Control ring (external); Control ring (internal); None; Oil-filled; Pre-muffled / dampening ring; Vented / ported; Other
pt-BR: Controle de amortecimento da pele do tambor: Círculo central; Anel de controle (externo); Anel de controle (interno); Nenhum; Preenchida com óleo; Pré-abafada / anel abafador; Ventilada / com furo; Outros
it: Controllo di smorzamento della pelle del tamburo: Dot centrale; Anello di controllo (esterno); Anello di controllo (interno); Nessuno; A olio; Pre-smorzata / anello di smorzamento; Ventilata / forata; Altro
zh-TW: 鼓皮阻尼控制: 中心點; 控制環 (外部); 控制環 (內部); 無; 充油式; 預先靜音 / 減震環; 通風 / 開孔; 其他
sk-SK: Ovládanie tlmenia blany bubna: Stredový bod; Kontrolný prstenec (externý); Kontrolný prstenec (interný); Žiadne; Plnené olejom; Vopred tlmené / tlmiaci prstenec; S vetracím otvorom / s portom; Iné
de: Dämpfungsregelung des Trommelfells: Center Dot; Dämpfungsring (extern); Dämpfungsring (intern); Keine; Ölgefüllt; Vorgedämpft / Dämpfungsring; Belüftet / mit Loch; Sonstige
th: การควบคุมการหม่นเสียงของหนังกลอง: จุดกึ่งกลาง; วงแหวนควบคุม (ภายนอก); วงแหวนควบคุม (ภายใน); ไม่มี; เติมน้ำมัน; ซับเสียงในตัว / วงแหวนแดมป์; ระบายอากาศ / มีพอร์ต; อื่นๆ
ko: 드럼 헤드 댐핑 제어: 센터 도트; 컨트롤 링(외부); 컨트롤 링(내부); 없음; 오일 주입형; 프리 머플드/댐프닝 링; 벤티드/포티드; 기타
lt-LT: Būgno membranos slopinimo valdymas: Centrinis taškas; Valdymo žiedas (išorinis); Valdymo žiedas (vidinis); Nėra; Užpildytas alyva; Iš anksto slopinantis / slopinimo žiedas; Su ventiliacijos / garso angomis; Kita